Illinois, session 104th, SB4032.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to Black Contractors, Owners, and Executives to 8expand the organization statewide to help black business 9owners grow their businesses. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.